Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Ethics Rule 2.70 of the Rules of
the Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Chapter 62, App.), is amended
to read as follows:
Rule 2.70. Statement of Organization – Filing Time Limit
A Statement of Organization for a candidate committee shall be
filed with the Commission at any earlier time but no later than ten
HB3306 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(10) days after the candidate has accepted or expended more than One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) more than Four Hundred Dollars
($400.00) for his or her campaign.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/03/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.


















HB3306 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.